Illinois, session 104th, SB3141.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 112A-23 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/112A-23)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-23)7    Sec. 112A-23. Enforcement of protective orders. 8    (a) When violation is crime. A violation of any protective 9order, whether issued in a civil, quasi-criminal proceeding or 10by a military judge, shall be enforced by a criminal court 11when:12        (1) The respondent commits the crime of violation of a 13    domestic violence order of protection pursuant to Section 14    12-3.4 or 12-30 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 15    Criminal Code of 2012, by having knowingly violated:16            (i) remedies described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), 17        (14), or (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 112A-14 18        of this Code,19            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 20        the remedies authorized under paragraph (1), (2), (3), 21        (14), or (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of the 22        Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, in a valid 23        order of protection, which is authorized under the   SB3141- 2 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1        laws of another state, tribe, or United States 2        territory, or3            (iii) any other remedy when the act constitutes a 4        crime against the protected parties as defined by the 5        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.6        Prosecution for a violation of a domestic violence 7    order of protection shall not bar concurrent prosecution 8    for any other crime, including any crime that may have 9    been committed at the time of the violation of the 10    domestic violence order of protection; or11        (2) The respondent commits the crime of child 12    abduction pursuant to Section 10-5 of the Criminal Code of 13    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, by having knowingly 14    violated:15            (i) remedies described in paragraph (5), (6), or 16        (8) of subsection (b) of Section 112A-14 of this Code, 17        or18            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 19        the remedies authorized under paragraph (1), (5), (6), 20        or (8) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of the Illinois 21        Domestic Violence Act of 1986, in a valid domestic 22        violence order of protection, which is authorized 23        under the laws of another state, tribe, or United 24        States territory.25        (3) The respondent commits the crime of violation of a 26    civil no contact order when the respondent violates   SB3141- 3 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    Section 12-3.8 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Prosecution 2    for a violation of a civil no contact order shall not bar 3    concurrent prosecution for any other crime, including any 4    crime that may have been committed at the time of the 5    violation of the civil no contact order.6        (4) The respondent commits the crime of violation of a 7    stalking no contact order when the respondent violates 8    Section 12-3.9 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Prosecution 9    for a violation of a stalking no contact order shall not 10    bar concurrent prosecution for any other crime, including 11    any crime that may have been committed at the time of the 12    violation of the stalking no contact order. 13    (b) When violation is contempt of court. A violation of 14any valid protective order, whether issued in a civil or 15criminal proceeding or by a military judge, may be enforced 16through civil or criminal contempt procedures, as appropriate, 17by any court with jurisdiction, regardless where the act or 18acts which violated the protective order were committed, to 19the extent consistent with the venue provisions of this 20Article. Nothing in this Article shall preclude any Illinois 21court from enforcing any valid protective order issued in 22another state. Illinois courts may enforce protective orders 23through both criminal prosecution and contempt proceedings, 24unless the action which is second in time is barred by 25collateral estoppel or the constitutional prohibition against 26double jeopardy.  SB3141- 4 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1        (1) In a contempt proceeding where the petition for a 2    rule to show cause sets forth facts evidencing an 3    immediate danger that the respondent will flee the 4    jurisdiction, conceal a child, or inflict physical abuse 5    on the petitioner or minor children or on dependent adults 6    in petitioner's care, the court may order the attachment 7    of the respondent without prior service of the rule to 8    show cause or the petition for a rule to show cause. Bond 9    shall be set unless specifically denied in writing.10        (2) A petition for a rule to show cause for violation 11    of a protective order shall be treated as an expedited 12    proceeding.13    (c) Violation of custody, allocation of parental 14responsibility, or support orders. A violation of remedies 15described in paragraph (5), (6), (8), or (9) of subsection (b) 16of Section 112A-14 of this Code may be enforced by any remedy 17provided by Section 607.5 of the Illinois Marriage and 18Dissolution of Marriage Act. The court may enforce any order 19for support issued under paragraph (12) of subsection (b) of 20Section 112A-14 of this Code in the manner provided for under 21Parts V and VII of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 22Marriage Act.23    (d) Actual knowledge. A protective order may be enforced 24pursuant to this Section if the respondent violates the order 25after the respondent has actual knowledge of its contents as 26shown through one of the following means:  SB3141- 5 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1        (1) (Blank).2        (2) (Blank).3        (3) By service of a protective order under subsection 4    (f) of Section 112A-17.5 or Section 112A-22 of this Code.5        (4) By other means demonstrating actual knowledge of 6    the contents of the order.7    (e) The enforcement of a protective order in civil or 8criminal court shall not be affected by either of the 9following:10        (1) The existence of a separate, correlative order 11    entered under Section 112A-15 of this Code.12        (2) Any finding or order entered in a conjoined 13    criminal proceeding.14    (e-5) If a civil no contact order entered under subsection 15(6) of Section 112A-20 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 161963 conflicts with an order issued pursuant to the Juvenile 17Court Act of 1987 or the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 18Marriage Act, the conflicting order issued under subsection 19(6) of Section 112A-20 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 201963 shall be void.21    (f) Circumstances. The court, when determining whether or 22not a violation of a protective order has occurred, shall not 23require physical manifestations of abuse on the person of the 24victim.25    (g) Penalties.26        (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this   SB3141- 6 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    subsection (g), where the court finds the commission of a 2    crime or contempt of court under subsection (a) or (b) of 3    this Section, the penalty shall be the penalty that 4    generally applies in such criminal or contempt 5    proceedings, and may include one or more of the following: 6    incarceration, payment of restitution, a fine, payment of 7    attorneys' fees and costs, or community service.8        (2) The court shall hear and take into account 9    evidence of any factors in aggravation or mitigation 10    before deciding an appropriate penalty under paragraph (1) 11    of this subsection (g).12        (3) To the extent permitted by law, the court is 13    encouraged to:14            (i) increase the penalty for the knowing violation 15        of any protective order over any penalty previously 16        imposed by any court for respondent's violation of any 17        protective order or penal statute involving petitioner 18        as victim and respondent as defendant;19            (ii) impose a minimum penalty of 48 24 hours 20        imprisonment for respondent's first violation of any 21        protective order; and22            (iii) impose a minimum penalty of 96 48 hours 23        imprisonment for respondent's second or subsequent 24        violation of a protective order25    unless the court explicitly finds that an increased 26    penalty or that period of imprisonment would be manifestly   SB3141- 7 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    unjust.2        (4) In addition to any other penalties imposed for a 3    violation of a protective order, a criminal court may 4    consider evidence of any violations of a protective order:5            (i) to modify the conditions of pretrial release 6        on an underlying criminal charge pursuant to Section 7        110-6 of this Code;8            (ii) to revoke or modify an order of probation, 9        conditional discharge, or supervision, pursuant to 10        Section 5-6-4 of the Unified Code of Corrections;11            (iii) to revoke or modify a sentence of periodic 12        imprisonment, pursuant to Section 5-7-2 of the Unified 13        Code of Corrections.14(Source: P.A. 102-184, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 15102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-890, eff. 5-19-22; 103-407, eff. 167-28-23.) 17    Section 10. The Civil No Contact Order Act is amended by 18changing Section 220 as follows: 19    (740 ILCS 22/220)20    Sec. 220. Enforcement of a civil no contact order.21    (a) Nothing in this Act shall preclude any Illinois court 22from enforcing a valid protective order issued in another 23state or by a military judge.24    (b) Illinois courts may enforce civil no contact orders   SB3141- 8 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1through both criminal proceedings and civil contempt 2proceedings, unless the action which is second in time is 3barred by collateral estoppel or the constitutional 4prohibition against double jeopardy.5    (b-1) The court shall not hold a school district or 6private or non-public school or any of its employees in civil 7or criminal contempt unless the school district or private or 8non-public school has been allowed to intervene.9    (b-2) The court may hold the parents, guardian, or legal 10custodian of a minor respondent in civil or criminal contempt 11for a violation of any provision of any order entered under 12this Act for conduct of the minor respondent in violation of 13this Act if the parents, guardian, or legal custodian 14directed, encouraged, or assisted the respondent minor in such 15conduct. 16    (c) Criminal prosecution. A violation of any civil no 17contact order, whether issued in a civil or criminal 18proceeding or by a military judge, shall be enforced by a 19criminal court when the respondent commits the crime of 20violation of a civil no contact order pursuant to Section 219 21by having knowingly violated:22        (1) remedies described in Section 213 and included in 23    a civil no contact order; or24        (2) a provision of an order, which is substantially 25    similar to provisions of Section 213, in a valid civil no 26    contact order which is authorized under the laws of   SB3141- 9 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    another state, tribe, or United States territory.2    Prosecution for a violation of a civil no contact order 3shall not bar a concurrent prosecution for any other crime, 4including any crime that may have been committed at the time of 5the violation of the civil no contact order.6    (d) Contempt of court. A violation of any valid Illinois 7civil no contact order, whether issued in a civil or criminal 8proceeding, may be enforced through civil or criminal contempt 9procedures, as appropriate, by any court with jurisdiction, 10regardless of where the act or acts which violated the civil no 11contact order were committed, to the extent consistent with 12the venue provisions of this Act.13        (1) In a contempt proceeding where the petition for a 14    rule to show cause or petition for adjudication of 15    criminal contempt sets forth facts evidencing an immediate 16    danger that the respondent will flee the jurisdiction or 17    inflict physical abuse on the petitioner or minor children 18    or on dependent adults in the petitioner's care, the court 19    may order the attachment of the respondent without prior 20    service of the petition for a rule to show cause, the rule 21    to show cause, the petition for adjudication of criminal 22    contempt or the adjudication of criminal contempt. 23    Conditions of release shall be set unless specifically 24    denied in writing.25        (2) A petition for a rule to show cause or a petition 26    for adjudication of criminal contempt for violation of a   SB3141- 10 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    civil no contact order shall be treated as an expedited 2    proceeding. 3    (e) Actual knowledge. A civil no contact order may be 4enforced pursuant to this Section if the respondent violates 5the order after the respondent has actual knowledge of its 6contents as shown through one of the following means:7        (1) by service, delivery, or notice under Section 208;8        (2) by notice under Section 218;9        (3) by service of a civil no contact order under 10    Section 218; or11        (4) by other means demonstrating actual knowledge of 12    the contents of the order. 13    (f) The enforcement of a civil no contact order in civil or 14criminal court shall not be affected by either of the 15following:16        (1) the existence of a separate, correlative order, 17    entered under Section 202; or18        (2) any finding or order entered in a conjoined 19    criminal proceeding. 20    (g) Circumstances. The court, when determining whether or 21not a violation of a civil no contact order has occurred, shall 22not require physical manifestations of abuse on the person of 23the victim.24    (h) Penalties.25        (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 26    subsection, where the court finds the commission of a   SB3141- 11 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    crime or contempt of court under subsection (a) or (b) of 2    this Section, the penalty shall be the penalty that 3    generally applies in such criminal or contempt 4    proceedings, and may include one or more of the following: 5    incarceration, payment of restitution, a fine, payment of 6    attorneys' fees and costs, or community service.7        (2) The court shall hear and take into account 8    evidence of any factors in aggravation or mitigation 9    before deciding an appropriate penalty under paragraph (1) 10    of this subsection.11        (3) To the extent permitted by law, the court is 12    encouraged to:13            (i) increase the penalty for the knowing violation 14        of any civil no contact order over any penalty 15        previously imposed by any court for respondent's 16        violation of any civil no contact order or penal 17        statute involving petitioner as victim and respondent 18        as defendant;19            (ii) impose a minimum penalty of 48 24 hours 20        imprisonment for respondent's first violation of any 21        civil no contact order; and22            (iii) impose a minimum penalty of 96 48 hours 23        imprisonment for respondent's second or subsequent 24        violation of a civil no contact order unless the court 25        explicitly finds that an increased penalty or that 26        period of imprisonment would be manifestly unjust.   SB3141- 12 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1        (4) In addition to any other penalties imposed for a 2    violation of a civil no contact order, a criminal court 3    may consider evidence of any previous violations of a 4    civil no contact order:5            (i) to modify the conditions of pretrial release 6        on an underlying criminal charge pursuant to Section 7        110-6 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963;8            (ii) to revoke or modify an order of probation, 9        conditional discharge or supervision, pursuant to 10        Section 5-6-4 of the Unified Code of Corrections; or11            (iii) to revoke or modify a sentence of periodic 12        imprisonment, pursuant to Section 5-7-2 of the Unified 13        Code of Corrections. 14(Source: P.A. 103-407, eff. 7-28-23.) 15    Section 15. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 16amended by changing Section 223 as follows: 17    (750 ILCS 60/223)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-23)18    Sec. 223. Enforcement of orders of protection. 19    (a) When violation is crime. A violation of any order of 20protection, whether issued in a civil or criminal proceeding 21or by a military judge, shall be enforced by a criminal court 22when:23        (1) The respondent commits the crime of violation of 24    an order of protection pursuant to Section 12-3.4 or 12-30   SB3141- 13 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 2    by having knowingly violated:3            (i) remedies described in paragraphs (1), (2), 4        (3), (14), or (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 5        of this Act; or6            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 7        the remedies authorized under paragraphs (1), (2), 8        (3), (14), and (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 9        of this Act, in a valid order of protection which is 10        authorized under the laws of another state, tribe, or 11        United States territory; or12            (iii) any other remedy when the act constitutes a 13        crime against the protected parties as defined by the 14        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.15        Prosecution for a violation of an order of protection 16    shall not bar concurrent prosecution for any other crime, 17    including any crime that may have been committed at the 18    time of the violation of the order of protection; or19        (2) The respondent commits the crime of child 20    abduction pursuant to Section 10-5 of the Criminal Code of 21    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, by having knowingly 22    violated:23            (i) remedies described in paragraphs (5), (6) or 24        (8) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of this Act; or25            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 26        the remedies authorized under paragraphs (5), (6), or   SB3141- 14 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1        (8) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of this Act, in a 2        valid order of protection which is authorized under 3        the laws of another state, tribe, or United States 4        territory.5    (b) When violation is contempt of court. A violation of 6any valid Illinois order of protection, whether issued in a 7civil or criminal proceeding or by a military judge, may be 8enforced through civil or criminal contempt procedures, as 9appropriate, by any court with jurisdiction, regardless where 10the act or acts which violated the order of protection were 11committed, to the extent consistent with the venue provisions 12of this Act. Nothing in this Act shall preclude any Illinois 13court from enforcing any valid order of protection issued in 14another state. Illinois courts may enforce orders of 15protection through both criminal prosecution and contempt 16proceedings, unless the action which is second in time is 17barred by collateral estoppel or the constitutional 18prohibition against double jeopardy.19        (1) In a contempt proceeding where the petition for a 20    rule to show cause sets forth facts evidencing an 21    immediate danger that the respondent will flee the 22    jurisdiction, conceal a child, or inflict physical abuse 23    on the petitioner or minor children or on dependent adults 24    in petitioner's care, the court may order the attachment 25    of the respondent without prior service of the rule to 26    show cause or the petition for a rule to show cause.   SB3141- 15 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    Conditions of release shall be set unless specifically 2    denied in writing.3        (2) A petition for a rule to show cause for violation 4    of an order of protection shall be treated as an expedited 5    proceeding.6    (b-1) The court shall not hold a school district or 7private or non-public school or any of its employees in civil 8or criminal contempt unless the school district or private or 9non-public school has been allowed to intervene.10    (b-2) The court may hold the parents, guardian, or legal 11custodian of a minor respondent in civil or criminal contempt 12for a violation of any provision of any order entered under 13this Act for conduct of the minor respondent in violation of 14this Act if the parents, guardian, or legal custodian 15directed, encouraged, or assisted the respondent minor in such 16conduct. 17    (c) Violation of custody or support orders or temporary or 18final judgments allocating parental responsibilities. A 19violation of remedies described in paragraphs (5), (6), (8), 20or (9) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of this Act may be 21enforced by any remedy provided by Section 607.5 of the 22Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act. The court 23may enforce any order for support issued under paragraph (12) 24of subsection (b) of Section 214 in the manner provided for 25under Parts V and VII of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution 26of Marriage Act.  SB3141- 16 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    (d) Actual knowledge. An order of protection may be 2enforced pursuant to this Section if the respondent violates 3the order after the respondent has actual knowledge of its 4contents as shown through one of the following means:5        (1) By service, delivery, or notice under Section 210.6        (2) By notice under Section 210.1 or 211.7        (3) By service of an order of protection under Section 8    222.9        (4) By other means demonstrating actual knowledge of 10    the contents of the order.11    (e) The enforcement of an order of protection in civil or 12criminal court shall not be affected by either of the 13following:14        (1) The existence of a separate, correlative order, 15    entered under Section 215.16        (2) Any finding or order entered in a conjoined 17    criminal proceeding.18    (f) Circumstances. The court, when determining whether or 19not a violation of an order of protection has occurred, shall 20not require physical manifestations of abuse on the person of 21the victim.22    (g) Penalties.23        (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 24    subsection, where the court finds the commission of a 25    crime or contempt of court under subsections (a) or (b) of 26    this Section, the penalty shall be the penalty that   SB3141- 17 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    generally applies in such criminal or contempt 2    proceedings, and may include one or more of the following: 3    incarceration, payment of restitution, a fine, payment of 4    attorneys' fees and costs, or community service.5        (2) The court shall hear and take into account 6    evidence of any factors in aggravation or mitigation 7    before deciding an appropriate penalty under paragraph (1) 8    of this subsection.9        (3) To the extent permitted by law, the court is 10    encouraged to:11            (i) increase the penalty for the knowing violation 12        of any order of protection over any penalty previously 13        imposed by any court for respondent's violation of any 14        order of protection or penal statute involving 15        petitioner as victim and respondent as defendant;16            (ii) impose a minimum penalty of 48 24 hours 17        imprisonment for respondent's first violation of any 18        order of protection; and19            (iii) impose a minimum penalty of 96 48 hours 20        imprisonment for respondent's second or subsequent 21        violation of an order of protection22    unless the court explicitly finds that an increased 23    penalty or that period of imprisonment would be manifestly 24    unjust.25        (4) In addition to any other penalties imposed for a 26    violation of an order of protection, a criminal court may   SB3141- 18 -LRB104 18882 RLC 32327 b1    consider evidence of any violations of an order of 2    protection:3            (i) to increase, revoke or modify the conditions 4        of pretrial release on an underlying criminal charge 5        pursuant to Section 110-6 of the Code of Criminal 6        Procedure of 1963;7            (ii) to revoke or modify an order of probation, 8        conditional discharge or supervision, pursuant to 9        Section 5-6-4 of the Unified Code of Corrections;10            (iii) to revoke or modify a sentence of periodic 11        imprisonment, pursuant to Section 5-7-2 of the Unified 12        Code of Corrections.13        (5) In addition to any other penalties, the court 14    shall impose an additional fine of $20 as authorized by 15    Section 5-9-1.11 of the Unified Code of Corrections upon 16    any person convicted of or placed on supervision for a 17    violation of an order of protection. The additional fine 18    shall be imposed for each violation of this Section.19(Source: P.A. 102-890, eff. 5-19-22; 103-407, eff. 7-28-23.)